Tennessee statutes. Title 22 Juries And Jurors
Part 3 Jury Selection and Attendance
22-2-310. Impaneling jurors — Additional jurors.

The members of the grand and petit juries shall be made up as provided by law from the jury pool. In the event the original jury pool does not include a sufficient number of jurors, courts shall follow the procedures in subsection (b) for securing additional jurors. These additional names shall supplement, not replace, the original jury pool. These procedures shall be repeated, as necessary, until the grand and petit juries are completed.

Regardless of whether a county utilizes the automated or manual method of jury selection, additional names shall be selected for the special jury pool in the same manner this part provides for the selection of the original jury pool. Likewise, these members of the special jury pool shall be summoned in the manner specified in § 22-2-307.

In the event the presiding judge of the judicial district is unavailable for good cause, any judge of the court for which the jury pool is being selected may perform the duties required of the presiding judge.

If a judge presiding over a trial discovers that the number of jurors constituting the panel, or venire, assigned to the trial is not adequate to secure a petit jury and that the jury pool has been exhausted or contains an insufficient number of jurors, the judge shall direct the jury coordinator to comply with subsection (b) unless the trial is pending in a county that utilizes the manual method of jury selection. In that event, the judge shall direct the jury coordinator to produce the jury box in open court, the judge shall open the box, and there shall be drawn from the box, as directed by the judge, the number of names deemed by the judge to be sufficient to secure a petit jury for that trial. These prospective jurors shall be summoned by personal service pursuant to § 22-2-307(b) if time constraints preclude compliance with the notice requirement in § 22-2-307(a).

If a judge causes the jury box to be unlocked pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), the judge shall cause it to be relocked and sealed by the jury coordinator, and the judge shall write the judge's own name across the seal. The box then shall be returned by the jury coordinator to its place of keeping.

In the event the names of jurors are selected pursuant to subsection (c) for service in a particular trial, the jury coordinator shall make a list of such names, but the names shall not be removed from the jury list and, in counties utilizing the manual method of jury selection, shall be returned to the jury box. Service on a jury pursuant to subsection (c) does not constitute jury service for purposes of § 22-2-314, and shall not disqualify or excuse any person from service on the regular juries if the person's name is regularly drawn.

Jurors selected pursuant to this section may be excused for good cause.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of jury coordinator to select prospective jurors to serve on jury panels. OAG 10-125, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 131 (12/30/10).

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 25.21, 25.43.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 3-6-6.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, §§ 16, 18.

Law Reviews.

Six-Member Juries: Does Size Really Matter? 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 743 (2000).

The Tennessee Court Systems — The Jury System, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 489.

Collateral References. Jury
143-150.

22-2-311. Jury coordinator’s report in first day’s minutes — Investigation of irregularities.

At the beginning of the jury service term, the presiding judge of a judicial district that utilizes the manual method of jury selection shall compare the jury coordinator's report with the original tickets or cards contained in the sealed envelope. If they correspond, they shall constitute the jury pool for the jury service term, and the report shall be spread on record in the caption of the first day's minutes. Absent any identifiable irregularities in the jury selection process, the presiding judge of a judicial district that utilizes the automated method of jury selection likewise shall spread the jury coordinator's report on the first day's minutes, and the names listed in the report shall constitute the jury pool for the jury service term. Nothing in this subsection (a) is intended to prevent a judge or jury coordinator from subsequently excusing, disqualifying, postponing the service of or otherwise discharging a member of the jury pool in a manner consistent with this title.

If the presiding judge of the judicial district at any time believes that the jury list has not been prepared or renewed as required by law, the jury box has been tampered with or any other provisions of this title have been violated, the judge shall have broad authority to investigate. Should the judge conclude that any provisions of this title have been violated, the judge shall correct any irregularities necessary to ensure that this title is duly enforced.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, § 15.

Collateral References. Jury
82(1).

22-2-312. Selection and summons when no jury pool provided.

If for any reason a jury pool is not furnished at any jury service term as provided by this part, then the presiding judge of the judicial district shall have the right to select a jury pool as may be needed during the jury service term.

In all counties of this state, regardless of population, jurors required to try issues of fact in the chancery or other court, not supplied with regular jurors, may be summoned instanter, by order of the court, as in subsection (a).

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 3-6-6.

Cited: State v. Haynes, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 504 (Tenn. Crim. App. June 17, 2010).

Collateral References.

Excusing, on account of public, charitable, or educational employment, one qualified and not specifically exempted as juror in state criminal case, as ground of complaint by accused. 99 A.L.R.3d 1261.

Jury
72, 82(4).

22-2-313. Objection required to affect validity of selection.

In the absence of fraud, no irregularity with respect to this title or the procedure under this title shall affect the validity of the selection of any grand jury or the validity of any verdict rendered by a petit jury unless the irregularity has been objected to before the jury is sworn.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 16.26, 25.23.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — The Jury System, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 489.

Cited: State v. Hester, 324 S.W.3d 1, 2010 Tenn. LEXIS 897 (Tenn. Oct. 5, 2010).

22-2-314. Limitation on jury service.

A juror who has completed a jury service term shall not be summoned to serve another jury service term in any court of this state for a period of twenty-four (24) months following the last day of such service; however, the county legislative body of any county, may, by majority vote, extend the twenty-four-month period.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

22-2-315. Postponement of jury service.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions, individuals scheduled to appear for jury service may request a postponement of the date of their initial appearance for jury service. When requested, postponements shall be granted by the jury coordinator; provided, that:

The juror has not previously been granted a postponement;

The prospective juror appears in person or contacts the jury coordinator by telephone, electronic mail, facsimile, or in writing to request a postponement; and

Prior to the grant of a postponement and with the concurrence of the jury coordinator, the prospective juror fixes a date certain on which the juror will appear for jury service within twelve (12) months after the date on which the prospective juror originally was called to serve and on which date the court will be in session.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), if a judge holding court in the county finds good cause to postpone the jury service term for a juror, the judge shall notify the juror and the jury coordinator in writing designating an alternate date to which the juror's service is postponed.

A subsequent request to postpone jury service may be approved by a judge only on the basis of an extraordinary event, such as a death in the prospective juror's family, sudden grave illness or a natural disaster or national emergency in which the prospective juror is personally involved, that could not have been anticipated at the time the initial postponement was granted. Prior to the grant of a second postponement, the prospective juror must fix a date certain on which the juror will appear for jury service within twelve (12) months of the postponement and on which date the court will be in session.

A juror who is granted a postponement pursuant to this section shall remain under summons to appear on the alternate date without the necessity of the issuance of a new summons; however, the jury coordinator may, at the coordinator's discretion, issue a new summons.

The jury coordinator shall maintain a list of members of the jury pool whose service was postponed pursuant to this section, and that information shall be made available upon request.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Cited: State v. Marsh, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 728 (Tenn. Crim. App. Sept. 17, 2012).

22-2-316. Delegation of judge’s duties.

The presiding judge may delegate any or all of the duties imposed upon the judge by this part to another chancellor or judge authorized to conduct jury trials.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Cited: State v. Blair, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 1032 (Tenn. Crim. App. Dec. 17, 2009).

22-2-317. List of disqualified or potentially disqualified prospective jurors.

The jury coordinator shall prepare or cause to be prepared a list of all persons disqualified or potentially disqualified as a prospective juror from jury service due to being a non-United States citizen, convicted of a felony, deceased, not a resident of this state, or not a resident of the county. The list must be prepared and sent to the administrator of elections according to the jury summons cycle used by the court clerk. Nothing in this section prevents the list from being sent more frequently. The list may be provided by mail, facsimile transmission, or email.

The jury coordinator shall provide the administrator of elections with the following information about the disqualified juror:

The full name of the disqualified juror;

Current and prior addresses, if any;

Telephone number, if available;

Date of birth; and

The reason the prospective juror was disqualified.

After verifying that the person is a registered voter, the administrator of elections shall follow the procedures listed in § 2-2-106 or § 2-2-141.

In addition to the list of names, if the jury coordinator has documentation showing the person's disqualification under subsection (a), the documentation may be forwarded to the administrator of elections.

Acts 2018, ch. 837, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 837, § 2. April 27, 2018.